Idaho, session 2026, S1252.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 35, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-3537, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-3537. LIMITATION ON INCREASES IN STATE BUDGETS. (1) This section
shall be known and may be cited as the "Restraint of Government Uncontrolled
Expansion (ROGUE) Act."
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the an-
nual maintenance budget of an entity of the state government of the state of
Idaho, including but not limited to any department, agency, office, officer,
board, commission, institution, or state college or university, shall not
increase by more than the average percentage increase in the consumer price
index for all urban consumers for the west region as determined by the United
States bureau of labor statistics for the twelve (12) calendar months pre-
ceding the month and year in which state entities submit maintenance budget
requests to the legislature and the governor. If such percentage reflects a
zero percent (0%) increase or a decrease, the state entity maintenance bud-
get request shall not exceed the dollar amount of the previous fiscal year
maintenance budget as approved by the legislature.
(3) Any annual increase of a maintenance budget of any entity of the
state government of the state of Idaho may be higher than the budget increase
restriction provided in subsection (2) of this section in the case of exigent
situations, federally mandated expenditures, or sustained difficulties in
keeping with such restriction as it relates to meeting operational objec-
tives.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.